apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="abar/car__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>cariamos</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariámo</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariámos</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariámo</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caría</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caría</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__habería"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariades</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariáde</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cariádes</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carías</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caría</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carías</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carían</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carían</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caría</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caría</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caremos</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carémo</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carémos</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carémo</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carei</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carei</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caréi</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caredes</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caréde</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carédes</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carás</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cara</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caras</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carás</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carán</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caran</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carán</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cará</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cara</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cará</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>carmos</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cármo</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cármos</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cármo</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>car</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>car</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cár</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cardes</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cárde</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cárdes</l>    <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cares</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cáre</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cáres</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>caren</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cáren</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>car</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>car</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cár</l>       <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cando</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándo</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándomos</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándomo</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándomos</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándomo</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándodes</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándode</l>   <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cándodes</l>  <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>camos</l>     <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cámo</l>      <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>

<e lm="abarrancar"><i>abarran</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abdicar"><i>abdi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abocar"><i>abo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acetificar"><i>acetifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="achicar"><i>achi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adamascar"><i>adamas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="advocar"><i>advo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aforcar"><i>afor</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alancar"><i>alan</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alucar"><i>alu</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amoucar"><i>amou</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aplacar"><i>apla</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arrancar"><i>arran</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arriscar"><i>arris</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atacar"><i>ata</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atascar"><i>atas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bicar"><i>bi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bonificar"><i>bonifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="buscar"><i>bus</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="calcar"><i>cal</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="certificar"><i>certifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ciscar"><i>cis</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clasificar"><i>clasifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="complicar"><i>compli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confiscar"><i>confis</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="convocar"><i>convo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuadriplicar"><i>cuadripli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuantificar"><i>cuantifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dedicar"><i>dedi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desatascar"><i>desatas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desconvocar"><i>desconvo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desembarcar"><i>desembar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desfalcar"><i>desfal</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desmarcar"><i>desmar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diagnosticar"><i>diagnosti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diversificar"><i>diversifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duplicar"><i>dupli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="educar"><i>edu</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embarcar"><i>embar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enfocar"><i>enfo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enmarcar"><i>enmar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envorcar"><i>envor</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erradicar"><i>erradi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esculcar"><i>escul</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="especificar"><i>especifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estarricar"><i>estarri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="evocar"><i>evo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fabricar"><i>fabri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ficar"><i>fi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fochicar"><i>fochi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frutificar"><i>frutifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="identificar"><i>identifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indicar"><i>indi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="liscar"><i>lis</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marcar"><i>mar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pecar"><i>pe</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pontificar"><i>pontifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prefabricar"><i>prefabri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="publicar"><i>publi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recalcar"><i>recal</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reivindicar"><i>reivindi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="replicar"><i>repli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sacrificar"><i>sacrifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="simplificar"><i>simplifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="testificar"><i>testifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="triplicar"><i>tripli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verificar"><i>verifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
